District of Columbia statutes.
3-328

Repealed

Limitation on indebtedness; liability of Board members; deficits in sinking fund to be included in budget estimates; authority of Council to borrow from Secretary of Treasury; repayment; bonds guaranteed by United States.

Repealed.

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 621, Pub. L. 85-300, § 9
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 422, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(14)
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(4), 41 DCR 4636
1981 Ed., § 2-328.
1973 Ed., § 2-1727.